Land under the Sunlight

Lucifer









Now then them who argue with themselves, indeed if they are aggressive is it not the thing that they are troubled by? Now the brutish man, is he not frightened of justice that he transfers it to what it is not towards?

Now them who argue with themselves, do they kick themselves to keep fighting? Now if an evil man kicks them with instigating words, that they would continue to fight, are they an animal that they continue to fight?

Now them who portray the wrong use of concepts and words, portraying them in the clouds, they are them who erase truth, for they are anti-good, and against good people, for they are not righteousness supremacy, but they are against it and for the devil.

Now them for the devil in a nation, they are enemies of the nation, are they not?


Now hateful is the Shepherd who erases truth, who is against integrity, who says, go to ignorance again, and let there be trouble even between men and women.

Now then anti-authority, kicking up and kicking about was the seals, and they are leaders of the people below the ice, for many of the people listen to the seals, for they are very impressive and able to do things that many of the sea-creatures cannot.

Now then if any is against righteousness supremacy, yet they are dung that sticks to the base of the mountains that are the high plains that have shelves, and they are mud that sticks, and they are the retarded, those not worth considering.

Now the seal was brought to the kingdom, to a leader, and to the court, and the leader understood that the seal was very impressive, for below the ice it was very impressive, and the people even listened to the seal, many of them, and the leader considered, can the seal be a councillor? But the seal could not be a councillor of wisdom, and the court was people, for they were people who used wisdom, for people use wisdom, being people, and the seal could not be a councillor, though it was impressive, and so it was considered that the seal would aid in many things in which it could aid, and wisdom would be relied upon, and the seals words would be used as knowledge, as reports of knowledge, and wisdom would be used and the knowledge would be aiding, for they would have to favour wisdom, and the seal would be able to aid them in the finding of dangerous things, for the seal was impressive in these things, and the seal would even gather knowledge for the wise, and the wise would take the knowledge and favour wisdom and use the knowledge as it pleased them, and there would be a symbioses with the seal and society of people, and the people would favour wisdom, for they could not rely upon the seals to be councillors.

Now there is a spirit that says to Dagon, is there not, that we do not require you, for we have our kingdom below the ice, and it is a great kingdom, and it will fly and we have seals, and these can be our councillors, for stubborn are they, that they do not need the angel. Now then the angel will wait.

Now then there is a spirit, and he has a title and yet it has become a thing of a king, and the spirit was a rich man who went out for the people to judge the poor people, or it was similar to such, and he was a rich man, and he was not a seal, though he had the title of a seal, and yet he was not like a seal in any way, but he was like a rich man, and a king, and he went out to judge the people who were below the ice, for he was like a high thing from a mountain come down, and the people liked him, and he was very famous, and he was more using wisdom rather than the things of seals, for the things of seals he did not use much, and his name was known much throughout the Earth.

Now then above the ice, it is not sane to be having respect of Babel and the holy learning of them below the ice, for above the ice there is no bullying prejudice for schools, but there is only wisdom and foolishness above the ice, and every person has their own wisdom, and every person must go in their own ways, and there is no foolish bullying, for one must build great things and be great, and another goes with being a prince, and another is a king, and there is only religion that is offered for wisdom, and there is not criticism or judgment for not indulging in religion, for there is only wisdom above the ice, and to respect learning below the ice is insane, for it does not apply to anything above the ice, what they learn and say, and indeed it is known that they are bias, that their paradigms, also, are only an option, for above the ice there is God, or not God, and there is great trees and mountains and palaces. Now then the angel has considered that the spirit, Trump, may be restoring the environment above the ice.

Now many of the worthy to be above the ice were excised from their places and sent to wander the streets, to be taken in by those who were people and who were of good understanding. Now should they not then be going up above the ice? Now many of these people were zefar, what was called philistines, although there is prejudice concerning them and the greeks have used the name, and so they are zefar.

Rikitar-Bar had a cousin spirit that was fair shade, and it was called Rikiratis-Bin, and he was bitter and mean, envious with intense envy, and wicked and viscous, for he seemed as if violent, to be a sycophant with his mouth, for a violence was from his mouth, for a blade came from his mouth that was brought forth from intense envy, and he lashed out to stab and to jab, for desecrate he did, and many of the devil's blades desecrate, and there are those who have the devil's blade from their mouth, and others who are the devil's blade, covered in dung, for the devil often does cover his weapons in dung.

Now up Ariel the Mermaid goes and she sprouts the ability to be on land, for she goes up to be with her Eskimo husband, or some king, or a prince, or some other great thing, and she is a princess from the kingdom below the ice. Now it is another part of the God conspiracy that is on Earth.

Now there are not many women who have been beautiful to the degree, for it is the spirit of them, that angels have come down to marry them. Now rare are these women, the most beautiful in spirit.

Now there are some things that do cause contempt of perception of the things that are below the ice for those who are on land, for there are many odd things, rubbery, and odd, flapping about with flapping fins of some type.

Now them not believing in integrity, in purity, even of chastity when it is right, it is the flapping flippers and the tail fin and the rubbery substance of those odd things that are below the ice, for what they are is uncertain, and yet the mermaid, she is her who chooses chastity before marriage, for she is going up to the ice.

Now they call it percent, and it is degrees of a whole, and eighty, seventy, percent of communication is even acceptable among the people of Zion to understand what people are saying to them, and yet  thirty percent that want seventy percent physic ability, is any person able to understand, or when they are busy? Now then there are those at two percent communication, and the communication is evil. Now then if they are blaming people, as if it their responsibility to understand, at two percent communication, than they are in the realm of nothing, by wisdom, and they are only doing another thing. Now then binary begins at ninety-five percent, does it not? Now if there are those who are seventy, or eighty, and they are perceiving things being said, and people say, but I did not say such a thing, indeed it is what is called a misunderstanding, and it is only part of being people. Now then I will feed it to the seals, for I go to the lake where there is water, and I feed it to the seals, for let them know what percent is within the boundary of responsibility for what is called a misunderstanding, for is not the line at fifty percent? But indeed at fifty percent, even sixty, there is the line of failure, where a thing collapses into another thing.

Now then the councils of seals, and noble people below the ice, they gather and agree with each other prior to their gathering, and they consider with great bias and prejudice, according to how they agree. Now dictate what should be above the ice, in another kingdom that is not your realm? But they are not able to rise above the line of bias for them, for they would have to give up their titles and their possessions and be born again into the world as an Eskimo and most are not capable of such, that it is not a possibility. Now the seal must give up their title, and become a princess below the ice, and then go up onto the ice, or there are perhaps many ways, and yet do not the seals like being seals? For they are very impressive and have much ability. Now there is possibly more bullying below the ice than there would above the ice, for the land above the ice is a cold land. Now then do not communists mock the land with what they believe it to be? Do they not make a mockery of it, while they are brutish and mean, being more men and than men, for there is venom to the mocking, and the land above the ice, is it then even of their business?

Now if the mountain says something, or if the rocks that are larger that are rock formations, are saying that which upsets the people and yet for others it is only humour, yet the people cannot bear it from the larger rocks and mountains, for it is upsetting. Now mountainous is the land of America, and yet the Chinese, they are in places of rice fields and lakes, and their own mountains, yet they are their own mountains, and what is good to those of America is not good to those who are having rice fields and who are around the lakes, for the great mountains with snow, that are mighty, they are jesting them and yet it is offensive. Now then are not mountains considerate even if they do not always seem as if they would be, for they are mighty and large, and yet they are considerate, and words of kings are coming from them, for they are kings, or they formations that are having words of kings. Now then are words of kings ignorant? But the clouds have been foolish and not others. Now the mountains say, it is good to be having some weapon of protection, and yet there is soil that claims, none is ever required, and the mountains are saying, the freedoms of the people must be defended, and yet there is soil that is saying, the people cannot be trusted and they are reckless, and the mountains are saying, the people in governments cannot be trusted that you should build firm walls, and yet there is soil that is saying, have trust in people who are in government. Now then there is soil that is good and there is soil that is mud, and much falling of rain brings the mud from off the mountains and places it in the valleys, for the clouds have been with poison falling upon the Earth.


Now then it is considered that what was going in a bad direction was going more in a bad direction, and what was departing from integrity was departing more away from integrity, and what had integrity and remained, the remnants, they were going more towards integrity and so was the flood, and the rain might cause the mud to slide also from the mountains and depart to a different place. Now so the valleys departed as if for hell and the plains, they went further towards the sky, and it is so also for the plains of the women that are also the plains of the men. Now then mud and worse things stick to the mountains and shelves that go towards the clouds and it is not wrong to rebuke the mud. 

There is then that anger which is extreme anger, not in the capacity of most people, that's mouth goes from a person to be a child killer, in Mala, and it is a person of extreme anger, for when it is for a small thing, a beast they are, a natural brute beast, and not even an animal would do such, for they take the number of the beast in their rage and their extreme anger, for a demon beast was in them, indeed they were not human. Now then it will be tortured in hell for eternity, for the angels did not know what their problem was, for they have abandoned God, indeed abandoned morality, and was it not long prior that they abandoned? Now before anything takes the number of the beast, indeed it is abandoning morality and long prior, and it is abandoning truth and respect of society and what is just, and it is abandoning fear of God, and respect of decency, for if a woman has a father who is a natural brute beast, taken the number of the beast, indeed she should not learn his doctrine that would murder innocence and the innocent, for it is child killers by Mala who are child killers, and they go to hell, for let the daughter be removed less he should do combat to her innocence in an attempt to convert her, and yet her mouth does not transgress? Now he will push her to be violent in Mala, and against the innocent, and she will not be safe with him, for her you should rescue and take from her home and should she not dwell with Eskimo? Now the opposite of this wickedness was the father of the angel, the one given to foster him, for he was much the opposite of this thing.

Now so that you are not ignorant to sin wrongly against yourself and thus be dealt with by God because you were not told in a plain way, but then there are things from Heaven, and the child to them is them who are innocent at any age, being a person who can be called a child by innocence, and they are children of God, and yet those of physical age who are children, to those things from Heaven, they are not children to them, relevant to them, for it is not for people, even by Moses, though the physical children are even able to be incurring the punishment that the parent deserved according to their wrong, for these are those parents who cast their children in the fire, as if of a sacrifice, and then servant-less they will be, for there will be no servant in them, and will not the best thing they can be likely be a man of the League of Incel? Now it is also so for the woman, for the parents do such, and so it is not wise for most to be coming before the angel, and yet those things of the house of God, they have their roles to perform. Now then is it wise for a sea-creature, unless it is a mermaid, or some acceptable thing, to be coming before the angel unless they have asked? Now then come not with treason in your heart to the angel, but come then loyal to God, and the angel, he is a pillar of fire, for he is wind and flame.

Now them who will not harm innocence, they will not harm the child, for there is the child to all people, and them who offend the child with violence, by Mala, they will disappear to hell, and there they will be tortured for eternity.

Now them who are the Lord's, yet they dwell with an angel in their midst, and what do they have to fear, because they fear God and are the Lord's?

Now them who boast of wickedness do not fear God, but there is prayer able to bring a slash of a large sword of light against the enemy.

Now shut lips cause the valleys to dealt with by God, do they not? Now then it is good not to keep going beyond the limits of what is good.

Now them who belong to the devil, yet do you believe there is hope for them because they seem to have some good? But there is water, too, that is filthy. 

Now is the angel not a city, that a road goes to him that brings those who have offended others, who have the devil as their god, that they may come to receive the number of the beast, and they do not know what road they are on, for the roads are rivers, and they do not know they are in the river, and these rivers are smaller, and there are those who come by a different river, not knowing, and they come to receive reward in Mala, and there are some who come to join him, by yet another river, and there are some who come to be punished, and the Lord is able, and none is seeming to know what stream they are in and what the river goes to, or even where the river goes to, for there are them thrown into a river of fire, and they do not know they have been thrown into it, and yet at a later time they might know if they are able to know, and there are those cast into a good river, and it takes them to good places and good rewards and yet they are brought out later for some great purpose for them, for the Lord requires them. Now then the people are occasionally meeting that which is from Heaven, that has the power to cast people into a different river, and these people are from Heaven, servants of the Lord.

Now then phil'dam'shu, he is a demon found in some, sharp toothed, wrathful, a cowardly demon who delights in his arrogance, in being impious, and he is the core of some people, an old and crippled demon, corrupted of limbs, a miser for disgust.

Now them who follow the marching orders of phil'dam'shu, are they not the devil's people? Now go to demons for permission and say it is God's will?

Now then is it not a thing of another, and not of me? But is there any who says, all wickedness is and foolishness is, is errors in logic? Now it is very good understanding, excellent in intelligence.

Now the woman is not illogical, and her image was slandered in the clouds with animals and foolish. Now she has a man, and it is also integrity, is it not? For such is the wise woman, that she has a man, and the man also is her, for it is considering sufism of all people. Now it is a woman, and not an animal, that has a man, for the woman who has a man, she is worthy of a husband, for integrity she has, commitment to truth, to not being deceived by the foolishness in the world, a commitment to wisdom, to endurance even, and her who has a man is worthy of a man, but her who is a female animal, worthy of a male animal. Now then if people are liking people, and animals are liking animals, then for what reason does the Incel attack the woman when she is a woman? But they do not have the right to accuse her of wrong for pleasing God. Indeed it is as devil worshippers, and it is. Now does the devil so much desire to ruin and destroy the woman and to cast her into hell that he then attacks with what is like violence? But what time is it in history when such is occurring? Now the spirits of the Lord's, the horses he has sent to walk the Earth, these are not for the angel, for they are the Lord's horses, and the angel, the Lord's staff, and what things that belong to the Lord are the Lord's things. Now comforted was the angel by the horses, the dark horses, and at a time when there seemed to be no friend. Now these spirits, they are holy. Now then consider a horse as then a person who is strong if you must guess at what a horse is, and are there not also female horses? Now of the dark horses were indeed dark shade. 

Now by sufi, the person who has a natural brute beast, is she not in danger, that she should repent quickly? Now then the woman who does not have a man, yet is she not then worthy to be an animal if she cannot seemed to be a woman? Now then the woman who has self-respect, she is a woman, and him who would punish for it, yet there cannot be cause for revenge for it, for it is ideology if any man would punish her for it, for the rebuke of self-respect, it is worthy and without cause to be offended, and yet the man who hates people, he is the male animal, and if he is offended, yet he is a weapon of the devil, even covered in dung, pale or flexible, for wrath is with him and anger towards people.

Now with the knowledge of the sacred it is understood, and it is discovered the contradictions of man, man contradicting himself when he is speaking unjustly, for unjust speaking contradicts itself, for the device of it goes inward, and what would be sent out goes in. Now then a man can only swoop his weapon of Damascus down as far as his height, and so as far as he cuts down, there he is, for by the  increment of wickedness from his mouth or from his actions, if it is unjust, there he is by the increment of it, and yet when it is just, even wielded by Judah, so it trims what is wicked, and if a thing is wicked, indeed it is wicked by what is lies within it, ignorance, lack of truth and reality. Now the anti-truth, it is called idologic by me, and so if any is great by idologic, it is being great by dung, and these are constipated people, for if they are so constipated should any use a knife upon them, to save them? Now if any uses a weapon of Damascus to save them, yet will it spill the dung from them? Now there are men of such, men by dung, and there are other men, men by good and self-control, men by valour and bravery, and the many types of men who are men by a thing, and yet primarily a man must be a man by righteousness and integrity, and there are even types of dung who are as if female, who believe if anything is to cause them guilt it is to be counted as disrespect, for nothing should cause them guilt, and they have not right guilt on their own, and nothing should correct them even slightly, for they are not corrected on their own, and it is counted as disrespect by them, and for disrespect they are monster dung, anti-angels, and all the Earth should die for disrespect, for they have been touched with light, and they are dung, for at the spark of light the dung has swollen and explodes, for it is not the respect they seek of the woman who has self-respect, but it is the respect of a thing that has no self-respect, indeed the respect that a demon demands as an anti-angel.

Now the clerks are not offended by the name calling of coward, for they are good people by other virtues and not by valour, and the brave not offended by some things that the clerks are offended by, and there are many good things in the Lord's house.

Now them who calls an angel a thing, a bad thing, they are that thing that they call them, for they blaspheme wind and flame. Now them who launches war against a pillar of fire, do they not receive fire? Now if the Lord too is reaping vengeance, for what does a man stand who would oppose the Lord? Now oppose the Lord's horse, or the Lord's staff, and not oppose the Lord? Now fight the Lord's horse or staff and not fight the Lord? Now they have accused Muslims, saying, do not be Muslim, and yet the Lord requires them to be Muslims, and the Lord requires all His things to be what they are, and so you attack the Lord when you attack what is His things in being against what they are, and people are very valuable to Him, those that are His. Now then them who would steal God, they receive the devil, and them who are fearing God, for obeying Him, considering His will, that it is not always their government even, in what way are these not with the Lord and the Lord's people? Now then loyalty to a nation is then loyalty to God, and in what way it departs with traitors, so it remains loyal to the nation by loyalty to God, for the leader who is smart, they are being cast out rightly as the wicked are cast out, and the leader who is stupid, that they are those who believe, and actually believe, they are trying at least to do the right thing for their people and according to their leadership, and they are those worthy to receive a blessing when they depart, and to have a sun in a far galaxy, not as prominent as the Priest-King, and yet a sun, for it is further away. Now them who are smart leaders, yet they will not receive a blessing from the angel, and them who are departing, having a blessing from someplace else, they will not receive a blessing, for they have a blessing already, and it is a thing of Heaven they have, a blessing from someplace else. 

Now then is it not that people like people, animals like animals, rocks that are people, like rocks that are people? But there the concubine does not hate the man, though she is not offended as the wife, and the prostitute who is not enemy, yet will a man marry her, or will she be repenting and finding reason and integrity? Now then do well with what you are given if you will be worthy to be gaining more. Now if Lucifer is as a concubine by an angel's standard, then is it believed that the camel is worse than the ram? Now then it is not concubines and wives.

Now then if a man believes the angel to be a man, he is not a man, and if a man believes a religious figure to be a man, he is not a man, and if a man believes a pretty man to be a man, he is not a man, for will reality be different because of insolence? Now then a man by insolence, what is he? But if insolence is not with truth, is not the answer, what is the truth first that a person might answer truthfully? Now them who are jack-ass, not keeping to reality, they depart from logic and truth and then claim morality and even God? But their heart offers a confession, for a plea tumbles out, and it is spread before them who is accused, and it is a cloth that is spread with a fine meal, and he says, eat, and yet his heart is not with you. Now then it is not wrong to eat and a feast is offered. Now a poor peasant has offered it, indeed a woman, for is it not a poor woman who offers it, for being so foolish in such a way, then you are offered by a poor woman a fine meal.

Now them who cannot use intelligence to know what is already known about a thing, who feign stupidity, was not society already stupid that it should have been more intelligent? Now then is it a girl who pouts? Is it a flagrant woman who is flustered? Now are these considered women by women? Now then both men and women are able to understand.

Now heavy has been the ash of misogyny that has fallen upon the statues of the women, for it has covered them with what is not them, an image not them, and their statues were almost buried from the shelves of the mountains, for it was a low cloud that concealed their statues and lied. Now it was a sand storm or a dust storm.

Now then some people eat their own dung and they are full, for they also eat their own dung, and it is a practise of those who have the devil as their lord. Now in war they do so to intimidate. Now they take it from the ground, what was no0 believed to be there, for it was rejected by a man.

Now then as for the propaganda of war, let the people not eat what is not clean and become sick, for if tainted pork is offered, yet it is not forbidden to eat and yet is it beneficial? Now so the pork of Kir and Kursh is tainted pork.

Now then the clouds of Jupiter bring a rain of cleansing to the covered statues of the women who were concealed with dust by the dust storm of misogyny.

Now the woman is not a prostitute, lacking accountability, animal, immoral, materialistic, foolish, but the woman is not any of these things and the statues would have shown it and more good things.

Now then are not some of the religious groups implying for themselves what is not implied? But these forbid the people to take what God is wanting them to take and have and for the good of the kingdoms of the Lord, who is God, for in forbidding what is not forbidden they do the work of the devil. Now it has not even been said that a woman cannot lay with a woman, and yet the climate of the men is different, for there is then an advanced society that has the golden and silver cups of water, some with a small amount of alcohol, and such is not a society of sycophants, for Sodom and Gomorrah must be driven out. Now only it is not good for the gay man to be having slaves, because of his difference, for there are those who understand. Now then him who offers such is offering without the alcohol when there is a child, and there are also those who are innocent and those it is not seemly or right to be offering the cup with alcohol. Now then is it not reasonable that you do not offer the cup of alcohol to the priests of the descendants of Japeth? But they are priests. Now then is not the Christ, the son of God, obeyed in such that it is an advanced society?

Now these game-playing seals, they are not the wisest sea-creatures that are below the ice, but they are impressive, and yet the angel is a country.

Now then for the mathematics, the numbers, indeed the Universe is self-organizing, and it is the angels who are pillars of fire, and the things in the Lord's house, and it is even the repeating things, and at one side is the Lord, and at the other side is the devil, and the light excels the darkness, and those who go with the light go more to light and have eternal life, and those to darkness, more to darkness and eternal death.

Now then what is outside the bounds of the language, it is the dung that is picked up by some and eaten, and some soldiers pick it up to eat it to intimidate.

Now the psychologist, the seals, they have stock-piled turds to be used as a wall of defence against the Eskimo. Now wisdom is better than their technical thing of intelligence, and wisdom is on land, and the technical thing is for below the ice, and wisdom excels it like a world in comparison to a stone. Now the diary also brings the melting of the sea-ice, for it melts the ice, that all who will not be stubborn, they will sprout arms and legs and emerge onto land, for the light the angel sends out, by the Lord, for the Lord does it, it calls out all the sea-creatures who are not stubborn out of the sea, and yet the seals are not likely wanting to give up their titles of servitude below the water. Now all that the seals know is only implied things for those above the ice and who are on land.

Now why will any ask the opinion of animals about whether others are animals? But animals conceal animals, and even the gentle animal, does it not conceal animals?

Now the seals are calculators and intelligent to be able to calculate many things that can be used by the wise, and used by people, and they are very impressive at being able to find things. Now then seals, climb not up onto the ice-berg to bark at the Eskimos, for the spear is not wrong that flies, and the angel is a country.

Now camel's are the angel's lamb, rams, the angel's goats, the seals, the angel's house animals that also aid that he loves, and yet who of you is an angel that you say anything that is for God only to say, or for an angel only to say? Now if it is from God, it is not offensive, and if it is from an angel, it is not offensive, and some things from the king, not offensive. Now the angel is also a king of kings, and he loves his house, and there are kings in it and wise women.

Now then for the mathematicians, and the seals, also, yet it will not belong to you, but that you might be curious, indeed there are beasts that emerge from the devil. Now discover the book of truth, you mathematicians?

Now then if the Eskimo push you back below the ice, yet the angel will feed the psychologists and likes to have alliance with them. Now if there is stubbornness by the candle that you cannot confess me, yet what can be said of it? Now if the ceiling of praise is low for any, yet it is the limit of their own potential, is it not? Now when the limit of bearability, even indulgence, is passed among the masses, the thing is rejected, the great thing, and so a mob seeks to kill, or it is evil, and the thing ascends from that place. Now then climb into my boat, you seals, and I will feed you as long as you like, and we will be at peace with each other, for some of the sea-creatures are mobs at times, the ice-bergs flip over, and the mathematicians have not yet discovered the book of truth. 

Now then for the mathematicians, consider the spirit that is king of a place, that holds power? Now consider a spirit that fights it? But are there not the signs for you, that there are rivers, and the river of fire, and there are the days? Now consider then the existence of God, that if you consider it self-organizing, you still do not believe in the just-world hypothesis, because your limits are coming very early to know all the workings of Mala. Now the seasons of things, do you consider them? But if the Earth shakes, is there to be an eruption? Now the Earth has shaken because of the plague. Now then if the Earth does not shake because of a coming eruption, then what has occurred that the Earth shakes? But are these things of mathematics, really? Now then the book of truth does not belong to you, and yet still you wish to find the patterns of things that you might disrupt the environment? Now a pillar of fire is part of the environment, and them who would attack the environment, it is not as them who would kill an animal. Now if the pillar of fire is part of the environment and yet you are people, will you wish to disrupt the environment? But if the hurricane comes, then you will have Shepherds? Now then is not the hurricane known by finding it first? But still it is good that you are learning these things, and it is good that you are fighting, for you should not test God, and you are part of the environment yourselves. Now if anything attacks the canopy, indeed it is a foreign enemy, for it is ruin of the nation entire, for it is environmental terrorism, and the weapon, too, is part of the environment, that it is a thing of religion for some. Now then wonder who is the leader, the spirit of a place that has power? But is there not a spirit that has power in the places where you have been? Now there are also seasons to everything, and there are the kings in the lower Heaven, as I mentioned, are there not? Now then what time is it then, but is it not a season? Now then the Christians, the priests, and a royal priest-hood, they are having the Lord in such. Now then if the atheist will fly, yet will they not fly in their own way and each group must do as pleases them, as is right. 

Now the dust storm was Incel and even prior to them, and it covered the statues of the women, for that which was not people, also they hated the woman. Now also as cattle they approached shepherding the woman.

Now it is God, and yet Esua has blamed Jacob.

Now some of the seals will be of the angel's house if they are willing, and they are knowing then the ignorance of the planet, and that the kings are no more.

Now then the elite are gathered, the best things, and the palace is made in Mala, and then Zion, for the sun shines and the ice melts, and it is good for the sea-creatures, for the philistines were walking the Earth, and they had been cast out from their places to be taken in as refugees, and the dung of Jews, of Zion Jews and Hebrew Jews had committed such, and other evil things had committed such. Now then the prejudice against the philistines is only what was not known about them, for they do not know much about the people, so that it is only the name and yet there is not really prejudice against them. Now the seals will only know the ignorance of the world when they have joined the house, and there is a tempting for them to join, for some are wanted to join the house, and yet if they are ronin seals, and they say, we can catch our own fish, and indeed they can, yet they will not know the ignorance except in a void way, for they are below the ice and they come up occasionally. Now then believe the angel wants for the seals to be anything other than what they are? But there are ronin seals, and most of them are ronin, and a ronin seal must keep to the sea water, but a councillor seal, knighted of the house, they are gliding about on land, and they will know then what is enemy and what is only contempt, for the angel tells them, and they will know what must happen to the enemies, for they will remain seals and also have the rewards of land, those seals that are tempted to join the house. But them who take the fish the angel throws into the water, indeed it is not as them who are knighted to be of the house. Now they will be called reshin councillors, them who join, and they will be having the benefits of Zion and the keeping of the titles of the seals, and these are them worthy from below the ice, for the ice melts and the fourth day comes, and the glory of the sea is lesser than the land, for the sea will not fly, but the land is brought to them. Now then there is the world not of villages, but of Temples, and gold, and a more advanced society comes. Now then they will even have Frank Herbert to give them advice. Now then the councillor that is with some, he has also counselled many, or is it not so that he has counselled many?

Now when it is saying nothing, for it is not even irrelevant, then it is called nonedung that the people may not be committing error.

Now then there is that which by greatness answers roughly and yet great kindness is with them. Now then let the reshin councillors consider it, that they are not deceived, for nothing will be ever be said, and the calamitous trash is saying, it was not said, technically, and they are trash that is not worthy considering, for these are speaking nonedung when they claim it was not technically said. Now what is technical about the Earth and an advanced society? But there is what is never said, and yet it is only sentience, and so put away them who speak nonedung, for they are calamitous and they are like the mocking of falling stones down in the valley, that trickle down lower into the valley. Now then if your foot touches the rocks and some trickle down, yet do not throw yourselves from the ledge. Now then people do not live long, and it is not sufficient, and should they not be living much longer? But the Lord has created His elite soldiers, and He has prepared His seals, and Abishag has brought the philistines to greater honour, for they were too good for the people, that the dung of Jews drove out many, and the spirit of Trump, he is great and with great kindness, and not a jack-ass, and far from it, for he stepped upon many and he dispensed things from him that the people heard as if throwing away pieces of leaves, for large is he, not having to come down for any, a tree that is greater and larger than any tree that has ever been on Earth, and so stand behind Dagon if you are in the house of the angel. Now the fans about him come down about him, and go before him, and they do not move for the angel, for there are the spirits that fan him with great fans. Now then do the reshin kick at it, and they should not be angry, and yet there is cause for anger. Now then much of the planet has understood these fans. Now comes him on a palanquin, a platform that carries him, and his servants by Mala are about him, and he is above the people who would go to him. Now then, too, there are guards about him, by Mala, and so then go not to him, you reshin councillors, but stay where you are.

Now then consider the Frank Herbert was another with an opposite prophecy as part of the God conspiracy, and so it is understood that the Baron is actually the opposite of what they slander him as, and the the Emporer, he has come later only to build, for if house Atreidis is being envious that it does not wish for the fourth day, indeed the Earth is barren, and covered in ice? But it is covered in sand that does not have integrity, also? For it is covered in a layer of ice and over it a layer of sand. Now then it is ice and sand, and the Emporer, and the the house Harkonnon, it desires to terraform the Earth and to build upon the good land, that there might be an advanced society upon Earth. Now then there will be the fourth day, for the Baron is good and not evil, and the Emporer desires for water and for cities and for the Earth to be having Temples and gold, and palaces. 

Now then what they call trashberg is the ice-berg that is large and hallow, caused possibly by environmental problems, and it is the ideology of trash in the sea, for it is also communism, and it even promotes bullying, the hallow ice-berg.

Now the cult of hallow ice-bergs, it is foolish.

Now house Atreidis does not seem to want for water and for the Earth to have an environment other than ice and sand, and democracy it desires, and yet not the advanced society of the fourth day. Now then Abishag has prepared the Earth, and she is not a king whose princes feast in the morning, or a son who causes shame, to sells the land to others and cares not for the nation. Now because it is the time of Dagon, of Saturn, so Abishag is not wrong, for it is another kingdom that comes, for the time is for the kingdom of Dagon, and for Bethlehem, and for Sion and Zion, and Jerusalem.

Now then has the Lord, even God in Heaven, wondered if her who offered vegetables was the wife of a physician? But the Lord is God, and He is in the Heaven, and He is great, and yet are the people able to laugh?

Now David's kingdom has come, Solomon's kingdom, and the Christ has fulfilled a suicide mission, and John the Baptist as well, and then the fourth day comes and the angel's kingdom. Now then the ice and sand must be walked upon, for the fourth day comes, and yet it needs not to be trampled, for the ice and sand is able to remain even as people use their freedom to bring about their reward.

Now Incel is a race of people, an ethnicity, for it can be people of any shade, and if you are Incel the Incel will likely be at peace with you, for Incel is an ethnicity of men and women, for they will hate what is not Incel. Now they are disgusted by people, humans, everything that is not Incel, and they even desire to be disgusted, for Incel have a real misanthropy. Now then they are probably right, and yet they are evil and incredibly wicked, and they believe in humans, when they are women and not animals, to be treated as animals, for they are like cowards who hate towards the women who are people. Now then there must be a valley, a ravine, and the Incel will remain with their people, and the humans, the people, the ninety and eight of a hundred, for the Incel are perhaps two of a hundred, they will remain with their people, the humans, and so if the Incel men attack the woman, because she pleases God, it will be considered the act of a devil worshipper, for it is, for the Incel will be called Esua, for they are Esua, and they too are descendants of Isaac, and yet the real Jews are of Jacob, for Esua's people are even devil-worshipers, many of them, and they are a wicked people.

Now then if an Incel breaks into a dung-person, yet it is with the murderous hate of a Incel, for they are harbouring murder in their heart.

Now the extension of antisemitism is not antisemitic, but it is Esua, and there are Hebrew Jews who must pull their heads from out of themselves if they are to understand anything and be Jews as Jews should be, for their other things, the constipation of themselves, it is only wickedness.

Now then who answers nondung? But it is not really possible to answer, for it is rocks trickling from the ledge, and so then you are a person, an adult, and able to make your way in the wild.

Now then the kings were gone, and there was much stocks of knowledge, and yet there were mostly foolish Shepherds, and some of the Shepherds followed their own hearts, and there was none at the bottom level, who could Shepherd, indeed, they were at another plain, and the plains of kings of that which is below the ice, and there were some kings, and yet the kings were not made kings among them, and there were Priest-Kings in democracy, and there were leaders of meeting places, and yet there is the book of truth, and a pillar of fire comes, for is not the Universe self-organizing, self-governing, and it is the book of truth, and it is God. Now then how will the mathematicians find the book of truth? But can it be found by mathematics? Now then they operate in their own realm, where there are what they call patterns, and they look for patterns in these things. Now then are you philistines that you would discover the books of some of these things? Will you then discover the book of truth? But then these things will be for those of religion, and you are able to find the patterns that you can find, and what you can find, it is for you to find, and what you can learn, it is for you to learn, for it is good, praise-worthy. Now then if any becomes a lower priest of the house of purity and false goodness, yet they are them who have taken a circumcision from a sword. Now such is a type of wicked Jew, for it is not really a Jew.

Now sodom is in the heart of many Incel, and them who make themselves dung to be committing things of Sodom, it is an Incel, for it is a thing of Esua to do combat.

Now a Sodomite places a rope around his neck, and it is a thing of Incel.

Now then then when the Incel attacks the innocent, going to dung form, bypassed is all truth, and fixed in place is a false reality for him to attack, and even the number of the beast he takes, and he is a natural brute beast that is violent in Mala, a raging thing that is homicidal.

Now then the theatrical have danced, for they do not know it, and they are not aware, for they show off their dancing, and some even arrogant and retarded that they dance.

Now then misogynists, do you not honour the prince, and honour the king, that you have hated the woman? But have you not first hated the prince and the king?

Now then do you give honour to what is deserving of honour? Now do you refrain from unjust bullying? Now do you love your neighbour? But has not rebellion come before rebellion against other things, for you have committed the full rebellion against many things because of the first rebellion, and these are a type of wicked. Now then it is even like a river that a person preferred, and they say, it is an acceptable river, and it goes down in water-falls, going further into the Earth, and are they not really a brutal person if they have rebelled so fully against what was not deserving rebellion? Now them who rebel against God are not the same and those who do not believe in Him. Now they do not rebel against morality.

Now then are there not different types of rivers?

Now pause not to pick up dung and eat it while you are speaking with others. Now then theatrical people also do so, for there is that which was not considered to be there.

Now then a woman who loves Dagon, she will not sacrifice a rabbit to him, for it is not good. For if it is so that she will not sacrifice a rabbit, then is she not then already married to him? Now the rabbit is the heart of the zefar person, and precious it is, for does the zefar kill a rabbit if they are not having to eat a rabbit? But then do not sacrifice a rabbit to Dagon, either, any who would sacrifice to him. Now what is not with Dagon, in that thing you sacrifice something if it pleases you. Now when a woman becomes wed, married to a man, then she will sacrifice a rabbit to Dagon on the rare occassion, for her heart is given to another, and it is a sign of being fully with another.  Now then a woman is a little girl, and she has a pet rabbit that she loves and adores, and what man is coming along to go into her house to kill the rabbit? But is this not a sick man, morally, very cruel and mean? Now is it not a man like Esua? Now she is the wife of his youth, who she has the rabbit for. Now what manner of person is it who goes to a little child and kills their pet rabbit, them having only one pet rabbit?

Now then the wise are able to walk among the rocks, stay sure and walk and even run and they are seeing the poison and they do not drink it and they are seeing the good and getting it and they having many abilities in the realm of wisdom, in Mala, and they are able to see. Now these are not babes who are able to do all these things, and they are able to do many things in Mala. Now the seal, it is able to do many impressive things below the ice, and below the ice it is very impressive, and yet above the ice, it does not even go there and is having no ability above the ice. Now then Dagon says, I will be above the ice, and you will be below the ice, for you are very impressive, and worthy, and I will feed you forever if you will aid me, and there will be an alliance, and you will be called reshin councillor if you are in my house, and your titles below the ice, they will be under it, as lower things, and reshin councillor, it is better, and them who are stubborn, who desire to catch their own fish, let them be forgotten, for who has time for them? For the sea-creatures are mobs at times, and swimming can be dangerous, and there are great things on land, very great things, and yet on land it is wisdom and not that technical thing, for your abilities are very impressive, and yet learn wisdom, as the better thing for you, and keep your abilities that are below the ice, that will be under your title that is below the ice. Now then the sea is filled up with many hallow ice-bergs that should have gone beneath the water again, and so is there not something wrong with the environment? But there are ice-chunks, small ice-bergs, that flip over, and what ice-berg has ever aided any person, really? Now then there is a great, the Baron, Harkonen, and because of his greatness, because he runs over the people without meaning to, because he is great, yet he does not harm them, there has been some resentment with some of the women, and they also are for nature, and yet he is actually good and very kind, and what tree has ever been greater than him? Now there is an aloof tree, hidden from the people much, and it gives much and it is enormous, and its bark is white, with paleness, and it is a jungle style of tree, and it gives even more than any, and it is not an ice-berg, and yet it has not become a Priest-King. Now it is not the same as the spirit, Trump. Now then the fourth day comes and a more advanced society comes and the valleys go low and who is concerned for what is in them anymore? Now then the philistines, the zefar, they walk upon the platform of a higher plain when the false Jews drove them out to be refugees, and Abishag did not really do that thing. Now then Abishag has prepared much, and Eretz Chadrack, yet it is able to survive, for by a great ark, much greater, they will save Eretz Chadrack, and every nation on Earth, having their arks, for they are integrity and those who are moral are supporting each other in integrity. Now then if there is a flood from the clouds of Jupiter, then people will have the arks.

Letter to the wicked,

Now why will you slander if there is a device that gives truth and it is not costing much money to use? But will you not be repaid in multiples for slander? Now why will you commit terrorism of any type when it costs millions upon millions to protect you? But why will any government protect you? But do you not know peace is maintained by the common peace of justice between the nations? Now the angel is a country, and Zion is a great nation, for it is all the Earth, and yet if justice is not executed swiftly why does any feel amazed that they are able to see the angel with their eyes, or if they are able to approach in any way? But why will any country protect a terrorist? Will they not rather bury your name, or deal with you themselves? Now wicked fools are impressed that they can blaspheme, as a person who rolls in dung? Now if dung glistens, it marvels at what is not, for dung is marvelling on its own, and so if any beast of the devils, and there are different beasts, is throwing dung at the angel even, or if it is sending out weapons, or if is changing the current of the areas, then are not those who are good being good and following God, and those who are the devil's, following the devil? Now then expect not for Adonijeh, a goodly man, to be able to help much with such things, for of course he cannot, unless it is terrorism that is really organized. Now the Christ went into the wilderness, for combat from the devil was coming and what devices could the devil use in the wilderness? But not are able to go into the wilderness. Now not much is written about such, and is there not a summery, so that it can be assumed the fighting was much? Now evil is the devil, and he must have fought much, and the devil is also stirring up enemies to a person, for they are not aware that it is the devil's will. Now the prostitute of the lake of fire, she is for abusing the child with cruelty, and only the communist daughter and her loyal to the men who bow before the devil is her capable of these things, that she takes the number of the beast, and is continuing to abuse the child of a person, for she goes to far lengths, and does what the woman is not capable of, for she is not really a zefar, or anything, but she is a prostitute of the lake of fire, loyal to the men who bow before the devil, and sometimes a communist daughter. Now then the dung is better than her, exceedingly, for the dung is at least dwelling close to land, and the dung is called righteous in comparison to her.

Now the Shepherd who praises the abuse of a child, he is a cruel person who has much hate, and he too is a child abuser.

Now the Shepherd who is for the people being going back to ignorance, or going to ignorance, it is a Pharisee. 

Now dung is better than the Pharisee, for it stinks and yet they know it is stench, and dung is better than the Shepherd who encourages the abuse of children. 

Now hate not all dung too much, for there is even the Lord's purpose, and yet too much dung is not good, and yet still the Lord has His purposes, and you do not know what He does.

Now the angel has also been a harmless volcano that does not harm the people.

Now the men who bow to the devil, they are child torturers, who worship the devil in such, for it pleases them, and the prostitute of the lake of fire, loyal to them, and it is the communist daughter also who is capable of such to abuse the child of a person, for she would wish to abuse innocence. Now she also takes the number of the beast, and these things are possibly organized terrorism.

Now then the work of the prostitute of the lake of fire, it is only two types of women capable of such.

Now dung goes about and it is fertilizer, and yet who is liking too much dung? Now then violence Gandalf has committed much against the woman, and he is not a farmer. Now then there have been farmers and Shepherds, and thus is the level of the entertainments that they are even farming and Shepherding, for they believe they are able to do it well, and they do so blindly, for it is grievances they have and what they are upset about, and yet it is without integrity, for dung is farming and Shepherding at times, and the pieces of dung are aiding the abuse of victims, praising dung as they are pieces of dung.

Now then they protect the victims of things and do not let it be known, and they take their vengeance upon the wicked.

Now them whose way of wrath is inverted, it is their testicles are inverted, and it is so when they have never dropped.

Now them who insults with my person by their mouth, yet I am not in it, and I pass away.

Now then if a person is suddenly angry with you for no reason, it is a test, and think you should take the number of the beast? But a wandering person, going from town to town, he is considered dangerous, for how can he not be causing problems, and how can he be considered worthy of trust? But who is he who has no dwelling? Now a single man, with no partner, he has no home, and yet a rich man, indeed he is him who minds his own business, and a man with a goat, he only has a friend. Now then bring not any abuse to the wife, for it is not good to trouble her, for why will you trouble her heart? Now him who abuses his wife, yet men are often very strong, and so it is not the same as him who is a dinosaur, an evil reptile, for him who is a reptile, a cruel thing with teeth, yet he is a reptile and the wife is a person.

Now go not to a spirit of a demon for permission, for it may dwell in the mouths of some, for believe you do not know its heart? But them who go to a demon for permission, they are them who strike a rock as they fall into the abyss. Now the demon remains where it is, and the person falls, and them who they considered to wrong, they remain upon the ledge and higher.

Now dung cannot wait to use wisdom wrong. 

Build not a wall of dung around yourself that you are not able to function and consider, for a person must be respecting society. Now your own dung, use it not, but flush it, and do not consume it unless you be an odious thing.

Now then if any is pregnant, man or woman, with the considerations of the hearts of other types of people, that they have more than their own problems, that their heart grows, indeed there is still the heart that is with the reality of them.

Now why will you have another man's jealousy? But is not your own jealousy for you, is it not sufficient? But if your heart grows so large, then what are you? But by the largeness of your heart is it so?

Now do you not consider that others are indeed respecting society?

Now for a time the angel was Paul Atreidis prior to the diary.

Now then Dagon is concerned about the retards with regards to their excitement and war ways. For what is not for them is not for them. Now a toddler does not climb upon an ice-berg, neither does it play in the lake of fire. But demons, and children of the devil, full of excitement, daughters of anti-Zion, and men, who are full of mischief, traitors to the Earth and its future, wishing to fly but refusing flight, wishing to advance, but hoping for stubbornness, anti-children and optimistic against optimism, for joy has over-taken them, or will it not, that they will cheer on the Earth, the people of it, for these children, do they represent the people? Now they will come to cheer us on. Now then it is acceptable for them to eat their own dung, for the children of these, are they not free? Now celebrate again, Esua, your victory, when Jacob is still with the Lord, for the Lord is owner of the Universe?

Now the Earth has other children, and there is not only the layers of snow and sand.

Now then society was not in place for that which would view Gogol as adorable, and there was nothing for the fruit of labour, for the fruit of labour was sometimes attacked, and by the base. Now then the fullness of the Nazis, and not the priest-hood had to be acheived, and not genocide, or the killing of Hebrew Jews, but the advancement of the Nazis as it was supposed to be, and not as it was wrong, for there were things even beyond them, for society was not in place for the coming of Dagon, and there was nothing for him to do in that world that would not be tedious labour, too far beneath him to do, so that he had no thing in society for him, and there should have even been contempt from the priest-hood of Japeth's descendants, for they were not able to provide for him the society that should have been, for he was the king's son to them, even an advancement of the king, and the priest-hood was the priests who sometimes questioned the king, as priests do, for peers fell too far, and there was nothing, and there were viruses among the people. Now only the prophets of the Hebrew Jews were worthy, and there was no Hebrew Jew who would not have deserved to die for coming near his place, and only the king was right to see him, and only the spirit of Frank Herbert worthy to be his councillor, for two wise men, both prophets, had come prior to the fourth day. Now then it was right to place a knife in the back of the neck of the base fool of the priest-hood who would think to oppose him, for in the thought of it, already he would deserve to die, and in the mouth of it, he was an abomination, for a wretched an unintelligent beast is it, a base and ugly stone is it. Now then who was the spirit, Trump? But he is some type of uncle, some great grand-father, a god of the philistines, and he is too great to speak to any of the people, for they believed he was not the best public speaker, and they were too far in the lower plains for him, for he is an excellent speaker, and yet who is able to speak to him? Who can speak to him except for God? Now this also they did not know, for they had not acheived the wisdom of it, that he was a kind and merciful man, and yet they were too brutal, and they projected and believed him brutal, for he did not tolerate their insolence, some of them, for he gave a mirror before their figures, for they seemed not to see that they were brutal that they believed him to be brutal in some way. Now he did not go to war, and he was concerned with wealth, and he did not speak as those who say what is peaceful to do wickedness and evil, and what things were required for them he did not provide, for they were like children who are wicked who say, be a providing father to me, and spend time with me, and they were bastard children, not even of his house, but some children from the neighbourhood, and disturbing they were. Now he is not even uncle of the angel, or is he? But the son of the king joined the army of the Lord, as some sons of kings have joined the army, and the spirit, Trump, he was not even an Uncle to Dagon. Now does he not come to build? But let him build. Does he not come to accomplish good things? But let him build. Now God is his father, and it is not the business of the angel, and neither does the angel know. Now Dagon became too great for his parents, who fostered him, and the parents were in danger of being severely punished by God, because of Dagon and his greatness, and nothing suitable was found for him on Earth, so that he joined the army of the Lord, and he was meant to. Now there is nothing that can look up to him and see his foot, and yet the Christ was far greater than him. Now then the ice melts, and it is good, for it is necessary, and the philistines have walked as refugees, having been excised from the sea water when the ice had moved, for it is a sign and right, and no doubt it was horrible. Now then the prince is a bastard among the priest-hood, for he has not laboured. It has always been so. Now there is contempt, or should be.

Now zefar have walked the streets as refugees, the philistines, and they are on a higher plain, and they are the people of Dagon and the spirit, Trump, he is too great to speak to the people, for he throws off pieces of leaves from himself, for he comes on a platform, a palanquin with a throne, and spirits of mala fan about him, and who is able to speak to him except God? Now what angel can stand against him? But would it be right? Now then the angel is a third moon, for the third world war, and it comes as a massive cold war, for it comes before the coming of the fourth day. Now will not the spirit, Trump, too be part of the canopy of light? Now then is he not also a god of the philistines? Now then where does he come from? But the serpent has not sold him any fruit, and yet he is also a god of the philistines. Now to him Dagon is the angel, and to the philistines he is Dagon. Now then Mars, what shall we do? Now then scorn not Jerusalem, if he is too great for you.

The answer is always retards. That is what the problem is.

There is no such thing as being mentally ill. There is being retarded. Temporary problems occur and it is often because of dung. What is not retardation is not being mentally ill.

It is unreasonable to attack your own people with any genocide, and it is always understood that a portion will be purposeful mistakes or mistakes. 

Religion is enlightenment and wisdom and is considered to always be beneficial.

All people have religion by nature and not nurture, for atheists have their own thing that is theirs.

Now then all things have had their right time and place and their right enemy and yet those things have been against the opposite of their right enemy. Now even the animals of Sodom had their right enemy and yet they were against the opposite of their right enemy, for Sodom is right to defeat the virus, the parasite virus, too, even if the virus is genetically engineered to use technology as well, for such are the macro viruses of society that some are taking in the genetics of technology and large weapons, even money, and many types of tactics, being the genetics of the virus that have been engineered, and so then Sodom might be sent out to send terrifying messages to the viruses to be a further wall against the viruses, for Sodom is right to be used against the viruses that are most cowardly and wicked, that go beyond the limit of animal, for what goes beyond the limit of animal, the animals are better than it, for the virus is going to the level of natural brute beast, escaping all animal restrictions, killing innocence, having little ideology of justice and reason, in fact none to claim, and having no grievance as it pertains to humans or even animals, for really there is no actual grievance, then Sodom is right to Sodomize and mutilate and to send a terrifying message for the virus. Now what is the opposite of a virus? But an angel is as far the opposite of a virus as anything can be, for the virus is at one extreme and an angel close to the other extreme. Now then the virus blasphemes and wishes to oppose the angel, because the priest, the devil, of the house of purity and false-goodness, he is hating angels, and his house is hating angels, and the devil is a virus, and the house of purity and false-goodness, it is part of a virus, for it is natural brute beast, a cleansing flame of acid, a purity of dung water, and it kills child, woman, man, soldier, and all the things of the sufi, of all people, for it has no reason of justice and reason of war, even for the animals, for it goes beyond both. Now if men are speaking wickedly against the soldier of a person, for a person is a sufi, every person, then how does that man exceed the limit? But if he is speaking against the woman of a sufi, indeed he has crossed a line of morality, and a line of wickedness, for he exceeds a line of wickedness, and it is a man who becomes dung if he exceeds this line of wickedness. No stab at the woman, also? But it is not war, for you are not at the battle-field anymore, and a coward spy is hunted down, indeed he is incurring a worse thing than a soldier who dies in war. Now then the Lord is able to do it, and He is faithful to judge, that the man who will not be a man, indeed he will go to being dung, or some other thing. Now then the man who attacks the man of a sufi woman, for every woman is a sufi, according to the man of her, there is justice, and yet if there is no man in her, a man who is a soldier, how will any be right to attack the man of her, for there is no soldier in her who is a man. Now this too is Christianity and the truth, that you not be like the ignorant Egyptian who is spoiled and relies upon the integrity of others to keep society and to keep justice. For the Egyptian will show himself a wicked piece of dung, and worse things he does, and the world is filled up quickly with abuse because of the Egyptian. Now so the woman who is good will be beaten and treated like a prostitute because of the Egyptian ways, and the woman who is a soldier, a man who is a soldier, she will kill the children of people while a wicked coward adds to the abuse also, with his words, and praises the thing. Now then woman, let your husband then be the man who is a soldier of you, and you will only have a man, and not a man who is a soldier, unless it be for the cause of killing dung when there is such in society, and it is the society of the Sarmatians, also.

Now then those who have the lack of cognitive perception by wickedness, indeed have they not been greatly jealous?

Now there are different reasons for lack of perception is terms of cognitive things and there is the natural brute beast who has zero cognitive perception, for it is zero by wisdom. Now the natural brute beast, when they are taking the number of the beast often, it is indeed a natural brute beast.

Now when a person has been thrown into the river of fire, indeed they will not care later if there is no hope of Heaven, for they will have the devil as their lord. Now they have lacked cognitive perception and it is the way of the wicked to lack cognitive perception.

Now the fish was given cognitive perception by the seals, and indeed it is divided up.

Now then the fish below the ice, they are caught more by the seals than by those people who fish.

Now society has paused for the seals to learn their craft.

Now strive not in anything, for allow the lord to take revenge.

Now those who spill out their pornography, their fantasies that are within them, for adults know it is their fantasies and pornography, these people are not well, for it is an unwell person, that they spill out their pornography even by suggestion upon the public.

Now then if they are violent at the level of Solomon, yet it is violence.

Now then Solomon's level is the cold war and there is peace and David is required to fight the cold war for it is too much for Solomon and he cannot commit vigilantism without Adonijeh arresting the heros who dispose of devil-witches and dung.

Now attacked have been the Incel, mislead and mistreated with injustice, worthy people, many of them, who have been attacked by the animals, the stray animals that were not the dogs of my house, for they attacked the Incel in my name, calling them names, being disrespectful, bullying, and they were not my dogs, and they were strays, and the things of the man have already been fulfilled by the angel is childhood, for it is the caterpillar for an angel, and believe the angel will not at least do as a man, to go out to rebuke the vile dogs that attack in his name, for a man will, and he will not stubbornly be apathetic, for the vile dogs, let them be kicked, beaten, for they are stray dogs, vile beasts, and no woman of my house has committed any villiany of these things to be disrespecting society as the dogs that are stray do. Now then see, that you may know, the woman of my house support you, Incel men, in your war against these stray dogs, for they too hate these vile dogs, whether the dogs are male or female. Now think my house is low that I need injustice, impious dogs to make me great? But is my house garbage among the buildings that stray dogs are required to attack the noble?

Now then the slaves call burden what is not a burden, for they are the burden, and the sand is a burden.

Now how many mistakes does a fool believe they are entitled to before they are deserving guilt? But where does their conscience come to guilt? Now a brute fool is entitled to much mistakes, for he is a swelling of sand, and it is a part of Kir, a person of Kir that is so, for he is deaf to rebuke when he is committing wickedness, and he brings about sorrow.

Now then sweep away Kir, for he should be burnt, and charred his body will return to the desert, for is it not right? Now as sand he was, he will go to ash, to be among the sand.

Now then say not to an angel, I knew it not, for you contradict yourselves if you say such to an angel, but if you say so to a human, you do not contradict yourself always. Now an angel is knowing, for the angel is not a man, and the angel is even a thing, when it is not blasphemy to call him a thing, for a pillar of fire, a thing of the environment and nature, for it is the Lord's environment, for the Universe has nature, and the Lord's things too are part of nature, and it is the book of truth. Now then part of nature then is also Heaven, and because of rebellion, there is prepared hell. Now then if you are ignorant to nature, not having the full perception of a person, then it is the circumcision of the atheists, who have their own purpose and are part of Zion. Now then an atheist is having morality, less they turn to religion, and disgusting types of religion, for their integrity has made them atheists, or is it not so? Now so too are the religious people, who believe, for they are the stupid religious people, and they too are having morality.

Now the angel believes the seals would play no matter how serious the matter, and yet the seals cannot play much above the ice, for they are only permitted, by the Lord, to play below the water, and so the angel has the large pool for them, those who are with him, for religion is serious, for it is truth and all the Earth, and it is not for playing.

Now then everything, every person, mentally challenged, mentally ill, anything, any shade, anything from the landscape, anything that can dwell in peace with the angel upon the mountain is worthy to be there, for what is not worthy will be filled up with anger and tumble down.

Now better is that which can dwell upon the mountain than what cannot, for though a king will have great power of Ria, over two thirds of the Earth, yet if he cannot dwell upon the mountain, he is worse than anything that dwells there, for throw rocks down at his head if he rebels, for they rebel against you as well who rebel against the angel, and an agnostic, he is claiming foolishness, for he cannot be logical to be atheist or religious, and he cannot be trusted, for he is dangerous, and he cannot behave wisely, for he is an agnostic, not able to be logical and to have sound integrity. Now then ask permission to save the angel, or do so in your heart at least, for should you not at times rather be dealing with the angel's enemies rather than be coming in disrespect to speak kindly to him? But such a person is dung, and it is like an agnostic, who does not know how to behave wisely, and some of these might be cast into the river of fire if they continue. 

Now then keep your playing in the pool, you who are a seal, for it is also your way, and God has given you such a command and you have received it from wisdom, have you not? Now you do not meddle, as you call it, with society, or rather, you do not play on land, and you are able to bring more fish from the pool, I will boast, that I have for you, if you will be allied with me. Now you are a worthy friend, more worthy than many things, for you are also very impressive below the ice. Now what does not have the right to say something to an actual dog, it is for the angel to say to some, and he will not speak such to you, for the devil has taken his revenge often ahead of time, he puts things in the mouths of worthless things that should be said to them, and they say what they do not have the right to say to a dog, and so it is nondung, for do not smell the strench of a lower plain, nor stumble upon the falling stones.

Now then the fish zero cognitive perception it is a thing given by the seals, and yet those of low plains, even those of hell, they have less cognitive ability than those of a higher plain.

Now then call not a giant insane because he is big in domain in Ria, upon Earth, for such is a good thing. Now then the giant, he is a spy, for he sees in many places what the soldiers cannot.

Now them who call great things crazy, they are holding society back.

Now the agnostic did not realize they were more wicked than any.

Now what should not even be a consideration for you, what should even enter your thoughts is what you must stay at home for, and so what is a disease carrier will be killed if they make themselves into a weapon that spread disease, for there are dangerous and lethal diseases and it is not called bullying. Now the woman who is diseased, who is incontinent that dung comes from her, and she smears with it at the pretty boy, she is diseased that she does so, for it should not be a consideration for her, and indeed it should make her ill to consider it, and she must stay at home until she is well, and yet if she has smeared any with her dung, she should be killed. Now liquefied are her organs, and she is also full much with dung.

Now a special man, who is retarded, if he is committing wickedness for the dung in him, that his heart is with dung, and he follows his heart, placing dung in his head, that he is become a terrorist, he is right to be buried in the sewer after he has been killed. For Kir and Kursh, and for retardation he has had wicked wrath, and he is a dung man.

Now calling out to each other in the street? But a sand child is quick sand, and the answer is nondung.

Now nondung is nothing, not irrelevant or nonsense, for it is when a person has said nothing.

Now her who covers herself in dung, yet adults know it is her own dung even, and easily they know it, and dung with arrogant corn is the defender of her.

Now then the soldiers of cities, some of them, are perverted and wicked that they will not allow women to flush their own dung, for they desire to flush it. Now then no person knows whose dung it is, and yet it is the shame of women in a way. 

Now then should not the soldiers of cities, those who do such a disgusting thing to not allow women to flush their dung, should they not be killed, or their membership with the soldiers be removed if they are daring to do such a perverted thing to not allow women to flush their own dung?

Now then a pretty boy is not a man, for the woman will not say such to a man, or do such considering a man, and the pretty boy, he will rape her with a knife. Now then men cannot do what the pretty does, and he is not a man, but a pretty boy, for the pretty boy receives evil from both men and women, and yet it is not most wives of David, and nor is it always a wife of David. Now then the man will say, for he is having to be a man, I will have consideration of her body, and the pretty boy is not deceived, for he will dump her body in the sewer. Now then do not believe because it is not wrong for the pretty boy that it is acceptable for you, if you are a man.

Now then do not be traitors to the prince or the king, by mala, less you be demoted. Now if you are demoted, do not join the terrorists, for then separate yourself, leave society, and be then loyal to the prince, and the king, and then you are fit to return. Now say not, I am servant to the wives of the noble houses, and I will be a terrorist. But leave the land and be loyal.

Now then there is even the fair shade woman who is dark shade, for she does not care for her own people, men or women, and yet the dark shade is permitted, or tolerated to a greater degree in what things they would say because of being dark shade, and yet the fair shade who is dark shade, caring not for her own people in any way, for they are not a bastard, for a bastard cares more, those women will be considered dark shade, for they have great wrath towards their own people and because of herself and not because of them. Now she is not spoiled, but she was beaten much in the fields when she was younger, and she was terribly mistreated by the fair shade, and her family was killed by the fair shade.

Now the angel is not a man, that people remember. Now God has created you, and your children can die because of you considering an angel. Now you are already accustomed to these things, for your ascenstors, those you came from, were created by God. Now then do not lie to an angel, and do not tell them what you are, for they will tell you if it pleases them, what you are. Now then is God not capable also of carrying out vengence for rebellion? Now then the world is just, for the just world hypothesis is right, and yet for humans the just world hypothesis is proven wrong, for humans are not able to know because of the limitations. Now then does not nature carry out vengence upon the unjust? But so you will understand, for Heaven is part of nature. Now then go to the man with your playful evil, if it is for the man, for why should your children die because of you? 

Now then strive not, but allow God to take revenge. Now then Judah, too, does not strive. Now permit not a seal to explain what is in another realm of humans, for they are, some, the angel's loved house pets, and they will not be called pets. Now contradict yourselves no more, but conform to reality as the atheist and the religious person, some of you conforming more to what you would believe to be logic, only it is not logic. Now then a woman must have a man, as a sufi, or else she will not be able to be a woman.

Now if an angel humbles themselves, and some become animals, yet animal nihilism is only nothing, for it is what is not, for it argues with itself and some argue with themselves when they eat their own dung. Now them driven on to fight by eating their own dung, yet is it for energy that they do?

Now a violent sicophant is the woman who considers fornication for men and for herself as well, for there are ill women, and they are unwell, and they would not have been unwell if they were not retarded, for there was no real deception about such things, except they had wanted much for none to be tempted to fornication. Now then those who commit adultery with a woman, yet why will they still commit adultery?

Now the woman should have a man that she not be deceived, that she be a wise woman, and she is a person, and her husband, too should be a person, whether a mother's son or a father's son, for animals will beat her, mutilate her, and natural brute beasts will torture her with outrageous bullying.

Now then for the man, marry not an animal, for she will be violent in a way that is violence for a woman, and she will abuse, torture, be a sicophant, in the manner of a woman, and if you should marry a natural brute beast, she may take the number of the beast in the fashion of a woman. Now then the violence must cease, for it is as the days of Noah, or is it not? But be not violent in the fashion of a woman, if you are a woman, and men, be not violent in the fashion of a man, if she is a woman, for what real reason could there be if she is a woman? Now if any is married to an animal, it is not marriage, for there is not marriage by Heaven between person and animal, that there was never marriage. But still it is bestiality, and a disgusting thing, and her who does it, she gets for herself perversity and shame, and the things of disgust to her, and he who does it, it is like adultery, for it is as a man who eats rocks.

Now then do not lie to angel, for believe they do not know better than you yourself would know? But then do not rebel against the angel, for you do well for yourself, and it is good to you, and if you dwell at peace with the angel, you are worthy to be dwelling with him, but them who cannot be at peace, they tumble down to their plain, where they are. Now then stay away from the fans of mala, of a great man, and yet do not resent him, for it is a plain and you are not upon it. Now then the philistines walk upon a high plain.

Now bring things for people to people, and yet them who bow, they are on a different plain than a person, for bow before the fans and you will not be unwell. Now then if you are having to bow, it is because of the plain.

Now a Hebrew Jew may not bow to the angel, and a Zion Jew may not bow, but others may bow.

Now if you may not bow, because it is wrong for you, than you may not bow as command from God. Now those who bow chose to.

Now she who has committed fornication with men, she gets for her the guilt of murder, for she has been a violent sycophant. 

Now a Muslim woman must cover her head if she bows to an angel, for she has a husband, and there is the man. Now a Muslim man must not have his head covered if he bows to an angel.

Now there are people ignorant in some things, and they are becoming constipated, and yet they are otherwise very good people. Now a little constipation is not worth noticing, or mentioning, and yet great constipation, and the person is a diseased person who must remain at home.

Now then when there is ignorance, there may be constipation, but there are those who remain clean upon their plain.

Now then Beelzebub, oddly, even has a poodle, and she is fair shade and yet dark shade. Now Beelzebub has many dogs, for many things he has, and so to the angel she is Beelzebub's poodle.

Now if any introduces things that do not qualify according to sentience, such as concepts, that they are even entitled to their own dung, then they are denying sentience by rubbing their own dung in their eyes.

Now let not people rub dung in your eyes.

Now if any is at a higher plain, they are not retarded for they have the great cognitive ability, and it is also called greater enlightenment, and it is many things more as well, but so that the seals can understand. Now then the diary lifts up the Earth to the greater enlightenment, for they were lacking cognitive ability because of Egypt.

Now the angel is an eight-trillion dollar thing, and it is sometimes right to call the angel a thing.

Now then be not soldier to the woman who is your wife, and it is not violence, but of other things, and yet if a man is a soldier to his wife, it is understood that others are being soldiers towards him. Now then he is at home, but he is away at war, and the enemy will not let him return to his home. Now then who will be punished for it? But are you animals that you believe there is not just recompense for everything? But animals are from hell, are they not? Now then deliver yourselves from punishment and so consider other men, you who are men, for there is the just recompense, and why will you become cattle to the man?

Dung has spontaneously combusted and it catches fire, with the zeal for the devil, for a fire it has for the devil.

Now special people are a type of dung.

Now then there are types of illness only possible for the retarded, and they are sick, and should they not stay at home?

Now then spread not disease among the people, you who care for the people.

Now what disease comes from words? But disease does not come from words.

Now the sicknesses of the not retarded, they are small ailments, and these should not be rebuked for not staying at home, for you must cover your mouth and not them.

Now the OCD is good, and a good person it is the sign of, and yet there are wicked who have it. Now it is not disease in any way.

Now if any is a little ill that they must keep covering their mouth, yet it is not known by any person, and so what does it matter?

Now the Christ has said, marriage is not between people and animals, and he has said, it is between a man and a woman.

Now then sight for the eyes, it must be upon a higher plain, for then they will see if they are not blind.

Now then the Hebrew Jews must have the angel to be lifted to the higher plain.

Now then what will the Hebrew Jews be compared to? But they are like a boy kitten, an obediant kitten.

Now then the angel will not snuggle a king among the Hebrew Jews, for they are a king among them.

Now then it is loyal to be throwing rocks at those who are savage monsters, insentiant animals, who claw at the mountain and do not belong on the lowers plain below the mountain, for they belong a plain much further away, and not the plain below the mountain. So it is beast come up, who are sick, for the valley is sinking? Now it is good and loyal that you are throwing rocks at them if they are being a savage monster, and those who deserve to be upon the plain, they are at peace and they float there, and are already there, for there is no time with teleportation, for those who are high were always so, for there is no time in such a realm.

Now what is self-esteem issues? But it is not a thing. Now then a person is stupid, they climb for a time and God is doing it, and able, and then at the next plain they are stupid again. Now then they climb again, and do they have self-esteem issue? But when they get to the next plain they climb again. Now it is infinite. Now then people must be naked, also, in order to put on another clothing, and it is infinite.

Now it is stupid, self-esteem issues, stupid, and it is infinite.

Now then profanity is fertilizer, and it is profanity. Now then dung, too, can be fertilizer.

Now in how many ways is each book of the bible true? But it is infinite. Now with each plain it is true in another way. Now then them who can fulfill a plain, are they not one of them who are coming to Earth? Now the plain of reason, of the people, of Solomon, it has been fulfilled, and the fourth day comes, and they are lifted up to a higher place, all the Earth, so them who oppose are against all the Earth and their children and their children's children, for the angel is eight-trillion and so he is the Emperor of Eretz Chadrack because he is eight-trillion of money, and the Muslims are the Lord's send by the king to guard the prince, for they do not exactly take orders from the prince, and it is as such. Now then if the angel commits error, yet it is still given to them that they too should be in repentance who are given charge in the matter of the angel. Now then the angel says to Abishag, will you not enter the promised land even if all the people save for a few are not entering? Now if they are seized because of a belief in bureaucracy that is not there, indeed they will not enter the promised land. Now though you did not commit the things that occurred, yet they had to be alloted to you for a time, and so the angel is eight-trillion dollars of a thing, and he is Emporer because of it, and should not David prepare a rank for him? Now it is good that the Muslims are partnered with David in anything concerning the angel, for America does not dictate, and what is good for them causes other nations to be impaired, for Eretz Chadrack is not America, that it also be understood Sarmatians are considered angels, or they might as well be, and it is not wrong to consider them angels, for they come from man and not from Heaven, and the stars man has put up are the sign of them, that these are at a very high plain, and yet who are they and where will they be found? Now then if they are outcasts far removed, or some other thing, is unknown. Now then those from David, or of the type, are they not likely to have some? Now then let there not be war because a rank is not prepared by David, for to the psychologist the angel gives advancement of all people on Earth, for they gain ability by it beyond what has ever been, and it does not matter if he is what the religious will call him. 

Now them who attacked were those who wanted to defend, and yet there was a great bridge that had to be built because of the discord.

Now then who has placed the valley between the allies and those they would aid? But the bridge must be built. Now then what goes over the water fall will remain in it, and what is worthy to cross the bridge will dwell in both lands.

Now then dogs are the valley and animals, and even dung, for these are male and female and they are the valley. Now then defend not the angel if you are dung, animal, dog, for it is discord and evil to me, and was it not intended to be by the devil? Now the bridge does not know anything except that those who can dwell at peace with the angel are worthy to be upon that plain. Now then cease, dogs of Beelzebub, the poodle and the large dog, and those things that bully in a brutal way, for the dogs are driving away the noble, the pure, the good men and women. 

Now then the chads of a type have been discord for the prince, for they are not worthy of the Incel, neither the bullies of many types, for they have been discord for the prince. Now the prince is not any of the things known by the Incel, for the Incel are not their concern, and nor does it have anything to do with them, for the Incel are not their business. Now then the prince is worthy of the Incel, and the Incel worthy of the prince, for the prince is far different than anything the Incel have name for. Now there is a portion of the Incel not the enemy of the prince, but allied with him, for only the prince was worthy of the Incel. Now because the prince's realm was not given fully, there were those things not worthy to be kings of the Incel and the Incel rejected them and cast them away, for none of them were worthy of the Incel. Now they did correctly by God in doing so, that they cast away those kings and those that were not really princes, for they followed God rightly in that way, and they will be called faithful, loyal, zeolots of goodness, and the other portion of the Incel, they will called other things. Now then there is a portion of the Incel that is very good and loyal to God, zeolots who are not evil, for they have gone out in command of God. Now the angel who is a prince, who is an Eskimo, he will curse David even if he does not understand, for they are misogynistic only because of they rejected the kings and false-princes of the sea, and yet they are not really misogynistic, but they are meant for land and not the sea. Now they are people of palaces.

Now then Dagon is the Goose of the gander of the philistines, and he is the Eskimo, also, called Imuni who is the prince who has the portion of palace friends, for the portion of the Incel by Mala is people of palaces, and they are going out from the palaces for a time to be zeolots, and they are called faithful, loyal, zeolots of peace, and though the prince, Imuni has not known them, yet by the Lord it is so that they are people of palaces. Now because of such, there is the king and the prince, for there is the adopted father of the prince. Now he is not father to Dagon or to Lucifer, for Lucifer is the Christ's. Now then the Lord stole the prince and it was so by God, and he stole the prince from where he was, and so the father of the Eskimo, the prince, he is right to be the owner of palaces.

Now the communists have persecuted a portion of the Incel, for they are communist by heart, for they are below the ice, and the Incel, a portion, it was outcast from them, and far removed, for the communists had taken as if the world entire, and so the land of palaces had little remaining, and there are those meant for the palaces and the land of the prince. Now many of them are gentle people who were right to reject the sea kings and the sea princes who bullied. Now bullies they hated, the dogs and the animals and the land below the ice they hated and the seals called it misanthropy because there was no land that they understood, a land not theirs, for the land above the ice was believed to be what they understood of ice bergs. Now then palaces is not ice bergs and it is not what they have understood, but it is a land that was almost disappeared that the faithful and loyal departed to be zealots.

Now then fish, too, are money, and the sign is there that the few are casting large nets and them below the ice are catching less fish. Now fish too is fish, and Dagon is having a fleet of ships that cast large nets, for whose fleet is larger than his? Now he will feed the seals in the pools of him, for the seals are becoming reshin councillors. Now a portion of the Incel does not hate women, really, but they hate women below the ice? Now it is not really misogyny. Now a false Eskimo, too, they hate, for there are them not born on the ice who are communist. Now let the people of palaces understand, they did not grow up poor, but those who grew up poor, they may be communist. Now it is so for a portion of the Incel that they did not grow up poor. 

Now then infinite is the wisdom of the sufis, and it goes to the external, and yet those who perform in the external, they are in that plain, and to what degree they perform, there they are on that plain, and it is not better or worse. Now then she answers, does she not, who should be answered by her, and her maiden answers who should be answered by her, and large is Dagon's house by sufi, and Judah is the resting place, and the many kings are his. Now then them who keep their eyes upon Dagon and not God, is Dagon then the Goose of their gander? For is he then their god, who has God above him? But them who cannot keep their eyes from Dagon, indeed is he not their god, and them who keep their eyes on God, indeed it is not Dagon who is their god. Now then there are stones, kings, rock shapes of the philistines as well, and if any feels they should not bow it is command from God not to. Now then is not head lice good that it is good to become better? But head lice, it is a religious thing, is it not? Now then head lice is good, and them who are among others, will they not have head lice? Now then if any is diseased that they hurl themselves at any with their disease, are they not a terrorist, or a foreign enemy? Now do not be as a child, a baby not two years old, who does not know the different between a black fur animal and a dark shade person. But be then as a child at least who knows the different people groups of the different shades for it is for a child to know. Now let not dung use others of their shade as a shield, for it is foolish and offensive. Now a child is able, even them who are two years old. Now then there are many nations of the dark shade and many of every shade.

Now place not the portion of the Incel, the friends of the prince into the sea water where there is ice, for they belong upon land in the palaces, and they are not wrong to rebel.

Now resent not your wife because of the peaceful things of being a man in a peaceful life, for is it not better, if you are resenting her, to rather then be going with the soldiers, for you are not meant to be a soldier that you resent your wife, for you are not able to kill the enemies of your nation. Now then will you not join David, or join the cause that will be the right thing for you?

Now if an angel has placed his staff to the Earth, that a great wave, very great, goes out in every way and towards the capital of the nation, that if it is not resisted with good, it will overtake the nation, and if stubbornly ignored, the recompense even of a pit for the nation, then even gold you throw keeps the wave from taking the nation, and by throwing more gold, the wave is made a still thing.

Now then capitalism is right, for the nation has stolen from the Lord, for He has paid and you have not paid back, for you have stolen from the Lord, and even from the angel, will not many steal? Now there has been even disrespect and stealing and the Earth belongs to the Lord.

Now delusions of granduer means igno-slack, nigger, but not people of dark shade, for nigger can be any shade. Now it is not a thing causing problems for religion, for they may not cause problems for religion in Eretz Chadrack or America. Now they are also not causing problems for those who did not grow up poor, but they are causing problems for them who are igno-slacks, bullying people, those who bully much and are brutal in their ways. Now then the secular humanists have been fertilizer for the Earth, and yet if there is too much fertilizer it is not good, and the fertilizer is not the garden that comes up, but it for the garden to come up, so that the fertilizer cannot choke out the garden. Now then without the fertilizer the diary and the world of it would not be possible, and yet if there is too much fertilizer, yet much of it must be removed.

Now then actions, too, are they not owed to the Lord to some extent? But the Lord knows what is right, and He is God.

Now then soldiers too are plumbers and yet the nation does not want to hear of it, the plumbing, and people are able to know what human dung is, for it is an easy thing to know when it is dung, for the people are not babes, not two years old, and the soldiers of cities are perverts who do not allow women to flush. Now then soldiers of cities are not a natural part of the environment, and the angel is a pillar of fire that has not been seen. Now every person is a thing of the environment, of nature, for they are animals and things of the environment, and yet the soldiers of cities, why are they there? But they prevent people from flushing, and the people are not two years old that they do not know what human dung is. Now even though the soldiers of cities are comical in such a way, yet the people are not able to be advanced for the soldiers of cities are as an agnostic thing that is attached to what is pure, and it is a sickness for the advanced society, for the people are advanced and always have been, for the soldiers of cities will still have work even if people are able to flush the dung.

Now then if the people were babes, what would be written? But because the people are mostly children, they are being told in a rude way at times, for children do not know, and adults are for the hint, for they are adults, or even teenagers. Now then the children of the angel's kingdom, that is the Christ's kingdom and the Lord's, it is having a different thing called children, for they are children by the standard of the diary, children in wisdom, for they are not yet teenagers, most of them, and they are having to be told as a person teaches children, in a rude way, but to adults, they are given the consideration of the hint, for they are more capable in wisdom, so that they have been stupid many times.

Now then seals like to play, like children, and yet they may not play above the ice, for there is only real things of ultimate weight above the ice.

Now then Dagon has his seals, psychologists, and Biden his seals, and they are for different things.

Now some times seals know better, and would the angel complain?

Now priest of Anothoth, do you even know how to speak their language? But what are you preparing for yourself? Now prepare you for the fourth day?

Now the realm of the Incel was almost vanished, and so why have the communists been apathetic? But they have committed evil, committing injustice and the palaces were depleted and they went out being clever and lying to their enemies, for they were not anything they claimed to be, and they were not meant to be below the ice, for they rebelled rightly, and it is called a command of God, is it not? Now they must obey God. Now they have been zealots to take vengeance because of the communists, for they destroyed for no reason, and there was no reason for it, and they had their princes and their kings. Now has not the Lord commanded them to go out to take vengeance, to be zealots against the communists? But why will any be apathetic to what occurred? Now then why have the women of the communists, any of them, launched a war against that realm of palaces? But bring evil to the houses of your husbands? Now then must there be bullying? But indeed it does not have to be. Now are the gentle offender, or are you, women of the communists? Now they are not misogynistic, those who are people of the palaces, for had they ever wanted you to be cattle? But zealotry has lead to zealotry, and there has been strong opinion for no reason, and believe they do not understand such, those who are not fools? Now then lay down your combat, be repenting, and so then the Earth will be made right, for the false-princes will be vanishing and the false kings will be no more, for you have prepared a thing against God, have you not? Now then if the people of the palaces have committed war, yet it was not war, but there was war from the women of the communists, and it was not the Lord's will, or is something then wrong? But will you be made cattle by the bullying of the men who are among you, or will you be made known by the permitting of the Lord's will? Now then a portion of the Incel is people of the palaces, and what portion is dogs is not considered, for dogs have dogs, or is it not so? But then why do the people gather the dogs, the dung, and the noble together in groups, when the sheep must be separated from the goats? Now those women who will be made known by the Lord's will, that they have committed war against society, by not permitting the Lord's will, for they have made war between good and good, bringing about war, there is the portion of the women who are made known to what? But if any of them were not having their realm that they attacked another realm, are they of the realm of angels that they attacked a realm to support a realm not theirs? For where were the angels then, and where was their realm? Now for what cause do women in the realm of angels attack the people of another realm, of palaces? But is it not because they had not their own realm? Now the angel has understood that the philistines are very capable, for the women have caused war, and they have placed a realm to war against another realm and their own realm, has it incurred war?

Now the realm of the Incel, they are not evil, and consider the Lord?

Now everything is good when it is in its own realm and minding what is right for it, for is it not so that everything that deserves to die is that which has departed from its own things that it should be minding? Now then everything has a purpose and everything is good, except that which leaves its realm, and its things that it would be minding, it is that which is deserving to die sometimes. Now then if the palaces are depleted, what is the reason? But is it not because there was war against that realm?

Now then who among you, kings, leaders, councillors, is able to Shepard? But you are as if in a valley to the angel, and you can almost not be seen. Now then if Dagon leaves to be bothering David, then does not the low things of hell seize the opportunity against the angel? Now then do they not clamour soon, for the angel has humbled himself. Now then, you who are leaders, David is your king, for he is the ultimate king, and what was is not, for Dagon is above Saul. Now Dagon has not come to overthrow any nation, but do not rob the Lord, that it do well for you and be well for you. Now hear not the fertilizer, for it is for the ground. Now there are rocks upon the ground and there is the fertilizer.

Now because of judgment, the judgment of humans, you are not able to perceive what David can, for it is too much for you, is it not? Now if it is too much for you, yet it is many plains low, for the Earth entire will be brought higher, and it will be the standard, for it already was. Now not all things speak the same language if they use the same language, and what is not making sense to you, it is another language of another plain. Now them who demand to be simple, they are fine for a time, and yet later they will be wiped away from the Earth for they refused to climb higher, for the simplicity that was for them was good, that it was not simple, and yet because they refused to climb higher, to become more wise, they will be devoured by the Ocean, and they should be wiped away later when they still have not climbed. Now then if the simplicity is no longer sufficient, do you not climb?

Now then the wrath is not towards dung ever, nor should it be, but it is towards them who did not flush.

Now consider not honour of young men when you are an adult who has integrity and understanding, for poison is acceptable for women concerning dung, and the man must tend to his own things that he is right to do.

Now women, do not fight the Incel, for their realm is almost not existing, and yet it is to be rich, but rather fight in self-defence if it is right, for it is like a war of people against their own people, for the angel has not been known by more than three hundred, and yet it is much more, and because of his not being known there is war in the nations between these two groups. Now then the angel's kingdom must come in the right things, that the war is able to cease and many more things must happen.

Now there is Tolkein and Dune, and they are the two opposite prophecies.

Now then the palaces must have their realm, and the realm, is it not also against bullying? But is it not a gentle realm? Now then the people are too rude for the people of the palaces, or is not claimed by them who dwell in the palaces? But they do not realize how rude they are being, and how mean.

Now then the angel is above Saul, and he looks and loves Saul, and he loves David.

Now it is too much for the leaders of the Earth what is given in some things, for it is very upon the mountain, and they are upon the Earth with their hills that are mountains to them, for will they support? But they are not right to support anything if something is too much for them, for they must obey God and do their part according to their plain. Now can I injure them and pull them up many plains? But it is not right, for they must remain upon their own plain, and they are not right to support, but only to obey God in what they are given, there upon their plain, for is not the angel at some places in the Heavens and visible from Earth? Now by the matter of the palaces he is in the sky and so will they hurl themselves into the air? Now it has come from a god, and the god of the philistines, and it has not come from a person, that there is that thing of the palaces. Now then Abishag must obey God according to his realm. Now then yet there is a thing, the ultimate king, David, and he has said, it is because of Saul that the priest of Anothoth does something, and he was able to understand and he is the ultimate king. Now can even Joab do such? But perhaps, Joab too, is able. Now then David is middle class, as they call it, and so is his son, and Saul is even among the giant trees, like a giant among the giant trees. Now he became apathetic, for he lacked the zeal of David, for though he obeyed, he was apathetic. Now then because of such David must be the king, for Saul has other things that he is busy with. Now let Saul build his great things and be powerful, a greatly powerful person of the Earth and even of the sky, rich and wealthy, for his power is in other realms, and so David will be king, and will he not consider Saul in what he does? 

Now Saul is perched among the mountains, David, the large cat, the lion cat among the rocks.

Now if dung speaks, do not pick it up and play with it, for they were not even considering what was later said by you, that you played with dung. Now they say, it goes without saying.

Now if the people speak at the level of only a youth, why does any not progress the conversation, but rather descend into primitive lack of understanding of sentience? Now then do not stoop to play with dung if the people are having a grievance.

Now let Anothoth know what the truth is, for how many moons are required to be the moons? But none should disrespect her to believe she is not wise, for she is not some pety thing of the entertainments that you sympathize with what is not, for will you disrespect her? Now she is Titan, and not some foolish thing or some girl who has not found wisdom, for the standard for her is with much wisdom. Now sympathize with what understands many things better than you? But you should not disrespect her. Now then look to the Heavens and know the truth, for Anothoth has the sign in the sky. Now every wise woman encourages her house, and a foolish, it is not worth considering. Now cast not your own shame at her feet, for it is without reason, and it is scooped from your own chests, but cast it at her feet that she might tread it, for it will vanish before her and she will not be required to tread it, for it will vanish into the floor, for she is kind and good to you, and so let her love you in such, for she is a moon of the Heavens, and throw out the things that are disgust in you at her feet, everything that is disgust, for it was placed there by others and it is not your own that it is in you, for an enemy has placed it in the garden of you, and so you will cast it out at her feet, everything, and be lifted up, like daughters to her, for what age does she have? Now you are not really daughters to her. Now loved women, be enlightened by her, for there are rebellious fertilizer in the land, and they are not worth considering, not the male or female, and yet where is the female who is such? But the female is not fertilizer if she is dung. Now I have hidden much in the closet of the daughter of men, of the children of men, and so be not upset, for it is not her fault. Now her stuffed animals were moved around when she was not in the room.

Now then there is the man who is pregnant and the man who has not used the place of washing and cleansing of that which is rejected, for it is not worth mentioning, that none pick it up and play with it, for it is his bowls are full and it is not him, but then the bowls will be cleansed on their own.

Now is it better to say pregnant, or largeness of heart? But some have the other hearts of others as part of their heart. Now Dagon's heart is too big for him sometimes.

Now what elite soldier, out alone, in enemy territory, has become such that he became Elijah and ascended, or moved towards it, unto God, but he may be with the angels. Now then think many soldiers have attained such, for the zeal of God's fire, it can bring them to ascension, and unspeakable is the thing that some of them have accomplished. Now then they may join the angels for a time, these who have accomplished such. Now holy is it, unto Heaven, for as a prophet of zeal they become.

Now is Adonijeh wants the people to be apathetic then he may not be apathetic for apathy is the lazieness of another realm.

Now then run to do justice if the people do? But be apathetic if the people are apathetic? Now then will you loose your job that you panic? But the people will not make you homeless because they flush. But the people are advanced, and you are hired from where? Now then remove the sand from Adonijeh and he will not be slow and the soldiers will be mighty and fast. Now it is the sand that is perverted and which bullies and is a fickle girl.

Now the dung of a baby, is there any hope for it to be a man?

Now then the things of mala have more judgment than the things of Ria, for there is even greater weight with those things.

Now the nation was having sand, dung, weeds of Babylon, and because of apathy and laziness.

Now then the dung is not considered when a person gives religious things, and there is that which quickly converts good things to dung and it is quick to do so.

Now then why does any pause to play with dung when morality is already known and what must occur?

Now if they are not sand, the soldiers of cities, will they not permit that people flush when it is dung without doubt?

Now they are not enemies, and they are loyal.

Now then they do something honourable only for the chance to commit dishonour, then they never did something honourable.

Now then the sand of Adonijeh is a sliding dune against the person who has committed no wrong, and pervert, too, it will be called.

Now the soldiers of cities without sand, they are fast and mighty, and why will they have things against the people flushing?

Now then Eretz Chadrack is a fast moving river among rocks and mountains, and the fields.

Now the enemies of the angel, every enemy, has delusions of grandeur, and it cannot be otherwise, even if a person does not believe he is a thing of religion, if only because of the diary. Now the secular humanists, too, they have delusions of grandeur when considering their weight and power upon Earth, and yet the real atheist, not agnostic, does not have these delusions. Now the secular humanist, he is an agnostic, for he has much that is dung in him, for he is a thing full of dung, and with delusions of grandeur, he spreads his wings like a flightless bird, and wide are his wings, but small is his body, for he is a morbid and ill thing. Now then fertilizer is good, and yet the purpose of it is for the garden and not that the fertilizer might take flight. Now then why will any forbid fertilizer?

Now then delusions of grandeur, it is the striving of committing evil without reason and the bullying without reason, for there is not a thing as bullying, but there is only injustice. Now then it also does not understand, for it is understanding that is much the opposite of reality, as zero cognitive ability and it argues with itself for it believes in what is not. Now wisdom calls it, being a wicked thing that is constipated.

Now then if an animal believes that people are animals, that it speaks the same language, only it cannot be understood by people, they are upon the animal plain, and they are right to be removed from bullying the people. Now the animal, too, believes in what is not, for what is wrong for the animal is nothing and a thing of nothing to those who are people or other things.

Now King Harrod had delusions of grandeur.

Now Dagon is required to bring peace between the women who may be wives of angels and the Incel, for without his presence there might not be peace, for the god of the philistines is required.

Now Lynx is the name of Adonijeh without the sand.

Now then if none are worthy to do anything for the angel, then the angel again is above Saul, and he is in the Heavens then, and the pillar of fire is upon Earth, and yet do not put the Lord to the test.

Now there is the pillar of fire and at one side the place of palaces and the other side, there is the other kingdom, and the zefar are between them as a buffer, for there will be a curtain of fire and a pillar of fire between the palaces and the other kingdom.

Now let it be simple for you, for there is no more, but a prostitute of the lake of fire, she is a soldier and she always was.

Now then quick are some things to convert religion to dung or good things to dung, and dung is not considered when religious things are given and it is not considered among people. Now what disclaimer can do anything? Now then convert not good to dung, but it is always implied that it for good things that they should not be converted to dung, and yet what is cast upon dung, dung is often changing it to what is for dung. 

Now then has there not been God's humour in Dune? Now then did the angel seem like a serial killer? Now then it is house Harkonen that desires to build, and Trump is not evil, and the Emperor too desires to restore the environment on land. Now the soldiers are environmental terrorists, for they are for protecting the environment, and the angel is a pillar of fire, and there are animals and animal people, being the people who are animals.

Now what will scientists say of the pillar of fire, the angel? But Lucifer is a pillar of fire, and Dagon, a Hurricane, and both are of peace mostly, for ultimately they are for peace. Now then these things of Heaven, they are having a good role, for great good, in the environment, for they are from Heaven and not from the ground.

Now then is there not another thing that makes those with sight laugh, which is the wondering of the Hebrew Jews? Now then he who is offended that he should be called a woman, and yet he is understood to be a man, for it is religion, that any should say to him, Anothoth is your god, or your mother, then is not this man the sister of the angel? Now then it is offensive, that the religion not be corrupted that it is used by the devil to be wicked. Now then children is a plain, and adults is children at another plain, for children are children's children, that adults are upon a different plain. Now then be of a greater plain, that adults are children, for climb to a different plain. Now then what children do is not the same as what adults do, for children have different morality in some things, for they are the adults of their plain, and the adults are the children to others. Now then must you not fulfill childhood and do what you must do while you are a child, obeying God on the plain you are given, doing what is right and what must happen? But you are children to the angel, and three and a half times children to him, for there is not a comparison in nature, and the angel is from Heaven. Now then it is not a thing judged by the angel, for does he not love children? But he believes he is a kindergarten teacher who is able to cast out the lesser kindergarten teachers, for the kindergarten teachers were children to him also, for there are older children teaching children, and yet why does he wish to cast out any of the kindergarten teachers, for they are aiding the angel. Now there is not a comparison among people, for adults are three and a half times children to the angel, that the adults have different things that right that they must do, and the angel wants for them to climb, but they must also do those things they must do. Now such is Solomon to the angel, three and a half times a child to him, and yet he likes David's son, Saul's grandchild, for he is a good child, a blessing. Now then the seals can likely bark at him sometimes, and so it is, and they can do things below the ice that the angel cannot do, for they are very impressive in that way that the angel cannot do in any way? But the angel can also swim, and yet does it matter? Now he has loved the seals, and no person can challenge that they are far more impressive below the ice than any Eskimo could be. 

Now then Adonijeh, he is terrorizing the other children, and yet he is like a king among them, but the other children are angry at him. Now he is a little crazy, Adonijeh, and so the angel has considered there is nothing than can be done.

Now then Adonijeh, be listening to the angel, for he actually can tell you what to do, and it also so for the Earth. Now then the angel does not want to hear the mean things some of the children say about him, for they are children, and they are often emotional. Now then children do not speak such to the kindergarten teacher, for they say such mean things among themselves, and they rebel among themselves and the angel does not want to hear it, for it is their business. Now then Abishag, the older girl, she is good and trying to be good, is she not? Now she is shepherding them in what ways she can, and they are the Lord's children, and she is not permitted to go beyond the things of an older girl who is shepherding. Now the elite soldiers, they are impressive, and they are the soldiers of the school, and they are very capable, and yet are any of them wanting to sit with the class to learn some of the things that the children are learning or do they not have time?
 
Now Adonijeh should stay home from school, for though he is not as bad as Beelzebub's children, that mean jack-ass who teaches his children to rebel, yet he is very neurotic and he is adminant that he flush for the other students. Now then some students, they are clever and older and they know how to lie and how to hide from Adonijeh, and the teachers, does any of them want to catch the students who are flushing their dung? Now then Adonijeh is a very goodly child and he is very much loving good, and he is on a mission from God in some way, for should he be corrected? Now he places students in his special area when they have flushed, and it is a thing that has to be dealt with, and yet Beelzebub, the jack-ass, he teaches children to do what children would not do, for these child come to school knowing how to do evil things that children do not know how to do, for they are wicked, these children, and they know how to do things that the school soldiers know how to do. Now Beelzebub has children and yet he is rebellious against education and the system and apparently his children should not listen to the school. Now that jack-ass stays at home and he teaches his children rebellion, does he not? Now then school soldiers, the adults, will God be pleased with them because of the matter of the children who have been Beelzebub's children? Now  Adonijeh is not to blame. Now then does not God know all, for he has his birds and his vision, and do the soldiers delay because word has not reached them? Now then Absolom would have set fire to their fields and yet the angel will trust the Lord. Now then the school soldiers, they are mighty and strong and better at fighting, no doubt, than the angel, and yet the angel, he has wondered if some of them are working for rebellion for do any of them keep information from the Lord? Now do they tell the others when there is a problem? Now as for the other soldiers, many of them do not know how to read and they are as the children, for they do not know how to read and yet they are educated by the world and they are adults. Now then Abishag, she is good and the students formed a mob and said very mean things and Adonijeh took action and Abishag made rules that may not be able to remain, for they were made hastily and if there are to be things put in place they may have to be better that they are fair to the students, and yet Abishag is good and she cannot be blamed in my opinion. Now then Abishag's rules might be good but they may have to be made more fair and safe for the students. Now then Beelzebub's children, what are they? But Adonijeh must flush the dung, for he is very jealous of people flushing, for they call it zeal and yet others call it jealous. Now then be jealous Adonijeh, for people are going to flush the dung, Beelzebub's children, and they might flush it before you can get there. Now there is an invisible daughter who knows what has occurred, and the Emporer will allow her to discover what has occurred.

Chenoeh, a prophet, and are you really a woman, as is claimed? But should they pray to Chenoeh? Now then if they will pray to you, it is respect of God for which they prey to Chenoeh, for they are respecting God by praying to you instead of to God when there is a matter concerning Dagon. Now then the first is opposite and contained and the others, they are a large book right to left, and has not God worked such? Now then has the Lord given all? But think Dagon knows? Now did the Lord guide without your knowing or did he give you the understanding in advance? But Siona is not blameless if she does not do what is right, and she is a rebel? Now then the prophet will be called spy of the Lord. Now then Abishag and I go to different things, and Dagon is Leto, Farad'n, Paul, and even the other, and Abishag is a number of people, and she is prophesied of. Now Abishag has no reason to fear ever, or is it not so? Now Siona will indeed be called a traitor, and Duncan, too, is Dagon. Now then they are called fish speakers because of Dagon, for his symbol was the fish by the zefar. Now Dagon loves women.

Chenoeh Tawsuoko is the name of Frank Herbet, and though Abishag is not a teacher at the school, but her line is women by Tawsuoko, and Anothoth's line is women. Now there is also Trump, a god of zefar.

Now the fish speakers are called Sarmatian warriors, women, and if any names them what the prophet Twasuoko has named them, they are the mouth of Dagon. 

Now then Beelzebub teaches his children, or can that not be assumed? But he teaches his children to be rebellious against education, against enlightenment, and it is not like the rebellions of children who are in the children schools, for they do not say anything to a teacher and they rebel and what business is it of mine? But it is in their world to be rebeling and grumbling in such a way, and they will be pleased later? Now what does it matter? Only the children, Beelzebub's children, they are dung, for they are also trained in what a child would not be trained in, things of soldiers, and they are only in children's school, and they rebel against the school and they speak out in class when the teacher is speaking, and the school soldiers, has word reached them? Now Adonijeh is a student, and he is a very goodly child, also a bully, but he seems to have a mission from God and so how can any rebuke him? Now then if none can rebuke him, there is the clever teacher, perhaps, who does what is not wrong it can be assumed, to accept his help, even if he has his strange demand of wanting to flush for the other students when the students must learn to flush. Now there children are not called pets, but they call them children as well, and their children have what is called pets, for there is not sufficient words for the different levels of people, for it is an advanced society and not at the level of believing children are not them who are old in body. Now the game of such is played with Abishag and Dagon, for an aunt to Leto, is he not to follow it? But it is not a prophecy only, but also what must be considered if it was not considered, and Trump is a thing of the philistines, and it is good, and Trump is the god of it among the philistines. Now then there were not many at the time of Leto as Emporer, and yet does God not give good council by a prophet for both Abishag and Dagon? Now then Siona is not blameless, and she must have known, the invisible, what was occurring, and did she alert David? Now then prayer should go to the name Chenoeh concerning the angel, should it not, that they not considered disrespectful? Now then Chenoeh, she will bring it before God, will she not? Now Chenoeh, he is my councillor also, and is he not also the councillor of others? Now have not prophets been councillors?

Now then should something to speak to Dagon's ear? Now then the Sarmatian warriors, women, they will be called angels, and angels by an angel, for he is Dagon, a god. Now they are Dagon's and they are his on Earth.

Now then she is prepared to flush dung, she is not married, and dung calls the mouth of Dagon fish speaker? But then the mouth will not bite, but she will be Dagon, and she is a pillar of fire from the Hurricane, and so then she has the knife and the dung is demon.

Now then the egg is placed there by Dagon, and the seals will come to it, for are they only for being idle? But they are for a purpose?

Now the Reshin councillor will be considered for validity, whether they are really a councillor. Now then the Reshin councillor will have the entire diary, the egg, and they will be of the ability to advance their own diaries in a way that is with belief in the religion, for they must believe if they are above the ice, for they cannot possibly take the diary right if they do not believe.

Now then if you can send sperm to the egg you are worthy to speak about the angel, for Dagon has placed Jupiter on Earth. Now then if the seals in the right number are able to be sent by you, indeed you are worthy to speak about the angel, for a great army of seals you must be able to send. Now then the women who is an angel of Dagon, she is right to place her foot upon some, and yet none can come to Dagon unless it is through Anothoth. Now there are seven primary of Dagon, and they represent seven groups. Now them who are male who speak against the angel, will they hurl themselves into the sky? 

Now then is not Abishag the aunt of the angel? 

Now then was not the Muslim actually the highest thing on Earth? But come by the right road, for the seals are sperm? But then Dagon is far away, far away in the sky, and so you must humble yourselves and believe, for the Lord is able, and you must keep to truth, and you must even endure the tests, and some have already come by the right way. Now then who will be great will be the least, and who the least, they will be the greatest, and most have seemed to have come by the right road. Now then the seals, will they be called Rachel? Now then some will go with the philistines and some with Rachel, and there is no want for the persecution of Rachel. Now the seals will be Rachel when they are on land, for Rachel is a Reshin councillor. Now then it might be understood, the god of the zefar attempted peace upon Earth by the golden path. Now the angel has not, but God has, for the Lord was able to do it, for the angel is the Lord's staff.






